src/dictionaries/en_US.dic
विभाग/qEM
कॉलेज/xyM
नोनिया/JSK
स्वेच्छा/JWK
धवलिमा/JK
सेनानी/5O4sTv
फ़ार्म/FxUy
क्रीम/xyM
राजधानी/NO
तुम/tZuvM
पटकथा/JK
थपथपा/7G34sTv
सत्तानबे/H
पूत/=FE
ज़ख़ीरा/IC
जीवाणु/%R
रामकथा/JK
शिरावरोध/M
धुँधलका/IC
सौन्दर्य/qsTM
मन्त्री/b&
किरघिज़स्तान-वासी/O
आवृत्ति/PQ
वृत्ति/xUyPQ
तिज़ोरी/xy
इंडेंट/VM
झिरझिर/FE
अलंकार/yxEsTM
मृदुल/=sT
उधार/V8EDsTvLMU
घुर्रघुरा/734sTv
ग्यारह/HM
विदुत्/rsT
मोटर/yxELM
ज्यूस/yx
थुका/734sTv
फासीवादी/54sTv
प्रतिगर्जना/JK
रंजना/0G
त्रैलोक्य/MV
ज़मा/SKvA
लगा/m=vTs437
सिफ़ारिश/ELM
उन्हत्तर/H
छमछमा/734sTv
किलकिला/7JK34sTvCI
गु/vU
मंगल/qFEDM
संगीति/QM
गुठली/yxNO
मरमरा/7GCI34sTv
आत्मसमीक्षा/IC
बख्शा/734sTvGCBA
बख्श/8FED34sTv
योग्य/rsTMFD
आपत्ति/VPQ
जलेंद्र/M
अवधि/q
अंबिका/JK
किन/FZ
सूक्ष्माणु/R
रेस्तरा/SK
जुदाई/O
कृत/=sTME
मोमजामा/IC
छद्म/EsTM
गुरू/RrsT
बंधक/FEVM
अकड़/348sTvLMFED
जीवन/EUM
उकट/348sTvFED
मक्खन/MExy
इच्छा/WGCBAJKM
नीति/PQ
उगला/7A34sTvGCB
समोसे/xy
मक्खी/5NO4sTv
इति/QM
उचाट/8ED34sTvLM
अभेर/8FEDsTv
बारा/7AIGCB34sTv
दूरी/NqO
अर्ज़ी/NO
शुचि/rsT
उलँघ/8ED34sTv
उन/uZMz
बनजारा/IGC
ऋतु/R
एकलड़ा/G
उभड़/834sTvFED
रिक्थ/UE
अक़ीम/F
क्षमता/JK
पाण्डुलिपि/PQ
कटि/PQ
कटिया/JSK
पट्टा/VGCI
खपच/LMFED
कबाड़/8FED34sTvLM
ओसारा/GCI
उज्ज्वल/FsTM
कपड़ा/ICB
काँध/8FED34sTvLM
ठँसा/7AGCB34sTv
घनेरा/GC
किस/wuvMED
डँस/348sTvFED
किला/AIGCBJK
खिझ/348sTvFED
कुरच/8ED34sTv
कुरसी/NO
खुजा/7AGCB34sTv
खुजला/GCB7A34sTv
खुरपा/GCI
गिर/834sTvYLMFED
चभोर/8EDsTv
चला/734sTvAIGCB
शताब्दी/5NO4sTv
घोटाई/O
चुभो/134sTv
जाएगा/GCI
जुआठ/F8ED34sTvLM
छुटा/7AGCB34sTv
चेक/MV
परिया/JSK
छाल/834sTvLMFED
नँध/834sTvFED
भट्टी/NOxy
जिप/LM
रोडेशिया/yx
दिशा/qKM
छुड़/348sTvFED
गड़ा/734sTvAIGCB
झूमक/FDM
झूल/348sTvLMFED
ठर्रा/GCI
झाड़ी/NO
पाँच/HFM
भँकर/8EDsTv
थपका/7AIGCB34sTv
भँजा/7AGCB34sTv
ढाँस/8ED34sTv
डुबो/18ED34sTv
डुबा/7AIGCB34sTv
रँद/834sTvED
तुझ/uED
गुलछर्रा/CI
पटेना/6
बका/734sTvAIGCB
बकरना/C6
पछोड़/8ED34sTv
दुःख/EMUq
थाप/834sTvLMFED
नुँचा/G
परचूनिया/SK
नाच/834sTvLMFED
चेतन/=FMTs
चीत/MFED
अधुना/r
मचा/734sTvAGCB
धो/1834sTvED
दोच/LM
निराशा/WIKGC
बो/1834sTvED
बध/834sTvED
मणि/PQ
बरपा/7AGCB34sTv
तड़पा/7AIGCB34sTv
भरमा/7AIGCB34sTv
पारस/FEM
बाँय/FEYD
पुतला/GCI
जिन/zuMFEZ
बिंब/FDM
फीका/IGC
पीस/834sTvLMFED
सँठा/7AGCB34sTv
बहू/R
बुझा/7AGCB34sTv
मांग/FEDsTvLMV
होना/6GC
पोथी/NO
मुंडा/GCIB
हँसा/7AGCB34sTv
हँसी/NO
बैठाव/D
भेड़/834sTvLMFEDyx
हकल/348sTvFED
रौंद/FEDsTvLM
इकतीस/H
दरिया/JSK
सठोरा/CI
सनसना/G734sTv
सत्/rsTV
सपरा/7AGCB34sTv
लकुटिया/SJK
लात/LMFED
लेना/6C
सांबा/B
शीर/YMFED
लड़के/xy
दोष/MFEDV
सीटी/5NO4sTv
सारणि/PQ
सैक/sT
सुहा/7AGCB34sTv
कतरवा/734sTv
कचरघान/M
सेवि/QsT
अवगाहन/MFD
प्रस्ताव/MV
आकार/EUqsTM
लाभ/MEU
पहिचान/8ED34sTvLM
प्रगाढ़/rsT
सिँका/7GCBA34sTv
तोशाख़ाना/CI
जलदस्यू/R
झँवा/734sTv
पिरो/18ED34sTv
उस/wuvMFED
मनीष/FEDM
फ़र्ज़ी/O
शृंगारहाट/LM
मलिना/7G34sTv
बहत्तर/FEH
सुप्रिया/JK
खनवा/734sTv
फुनगी/54sTv
पैगार/M
कमवा/734sTv
वेदना/GJK
खो/834sTvEDU
बाय/YLME
इस/wuvMED
इन/uZzMFED
संविधा/sT
गंग/MFD
झंडी/xy
घटना/qICJKM
चटनी/NO
छ/HvYFE
निरीक्षण/MV
झल/834sTvLMFED
जिस/wuvMFED
तडप/D
कमानिया/SJKM
ढो/1834sTvED
तीजा/IGCB
पीछे/xy
मरना/GC6
फुलवा/734sTv
बुजदिल/E
मेसा/IGCB
सजनि/PQ
जंतु/R
सधा/734sTvAGCB
सब/wuvMFD
कलई/O
भिगो/18ED34sTv
क्षिप्र/FrsTM
व्यंजना/IC
लठिया/734sTv
प्रचंड/FDrsTM
कानून/EM
याददाश्त/LM
पिशाचिका/JK
रंग/yxvMFED
भूपति/Q
महारानी/NO
प्रकटन/FDM
चिखौना/GCI
चीन/MFEZ
मंत्री/b
प्रधानमंत्री/54sTv
कुंदरु/R
इंडिया/JK
गोलगप्पा/IC
भारतीय/sTM
बयालीस/H
अनुसूचित-क्षेत्र/M
केन्या-वासी/O
लख-पेड़ा/C
खुजवा/734sTv
चमचमा/734sTv
प्रत्यालोचना/JK
संप्रेषण/qME
तमीज़/LM
राम/op
शरणार्थी/54sTv
आप/utsTvMFED
सो/8134sTvED
परत/yxLMFED
सीता/pAGC
मह/834sTvYLMFED
पोता/7AIGCB34sTv
पो/134sTv
नन/Z
कह/834sTvYLMFED
क/sTYLMFED
हम/tuvLMD
नव/sTvYLMFED
कु/JRvU
पीना/IGCB
हरेना/6
वहा/SKMAG
तनेना/6G
विनति/PQ
धुंधल/MFED
पुरावस्तु/R
दिल्ली/xy
सटका/7AIGCB34sTv
ननदोई/O
पूर्ण/rsTMFD
सँजो/18ED34sTv
वीरांगना/JK
परिस्थिति/PQ
टिकट-संग्रह/V
बेहूदा/G
वीर्यहीन/sT
सनतानबे/H
वादि/PQsT
लोरी/5NO4sTv
बरान/FD
अकुला/7G34sTv
मानुषीकरण/M
दुर्भाग्य/qM
चिनगारी/NO
अन्दाज़/FED
धात्रिका/JK
पतंचिका/JK
डँसवा/734sTv
विषयवस्तु/R
मूर्त्ति/PQ
शफ़ा-ख़ाना/IC
बुद्धिशून्य/sT
चौहत्तर/H
किशन/op
लहसुनिया/SJK
जर्मनी-वासी/O
सुवर्चस/E
कुलपति/Q
सुर्ख़ी/54sTv
बाँझिन/LM
चौंसठ/H
खुटिला/JK
